Washington statutes.
RCW 43.117.050

Officers—Rules and regulations—Meetings.

The commission shall:

(1) Elect one of its members to serve as chair; and also such other officers as necessary to form an executive committee;

(2) Adopt rules and regulations pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW;

(3) Meet at the call of the chair or the call of a majority of its members, but in no case less often than once during any three month period;

(4) Be authorized to appoint such citizen task force as it deems appropriate.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5172; 1974 ex.s. c 140 s 5.]